Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1721
Property; bonds; exempt from taxation; when.

The authority shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments upon its facilities or properties acquired by it and used for a public purpose. Bonds issued under the Parking Authority Law, their transfer and income from such bonds, including any profits made from the sale of such bonds, shall be exempt from taxation.

Laws 1955, c. 22, § 21, p. 112;

Laws 2001, LB 173, § 13;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 304.